Illinois, session 104th, SB35.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Workers' Compensation Act is amended by 5changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 305/3)  (from Ch. 48, par. 138.3)7    Sec. 3. The provisions of this Act hereinafter following 8shall apply automatically and without election to the State, 9county, city, town, township, incorporated village or school 10district, body politic or municipal corporation, and to all 11employers and all their employees, including, but not limited 12to, sole proprietors and general contractors and their 13subcontractors, engaged in any department of the following 14enterprises or businesses which are declared to be extra 15hazardous, namely:16    1. The erection, maintaining, removing, remodeling, 17altering or demolishing of any structure.18    2. Construction, excavating or electrical work.19    3. Carriage by land, water or aerial service and loading 20or unloading in connection therewith, including the 21distribution of any commodity by horsedrawn or motor vehicle 22where the employer employs more than 2 employees in the 23enterprise or business.  SB0035- 2 -LRB104 02990 SPS 13008 b1    4. The operation of any warehouse or general or terminal 2storehouses.3    5. Mining, surface mining or quarrying.4    6. Any enterprise in which explosive materials are 5manufactured, handled or used in dangerous quantities.6    7. In any business or enterprise, wherein molten metal, or 7explosive or injurious gases, dusts or vapors, or inflammable 8vapors, dusts or fluids, corrosive acids, or atomic radiation 9are manufactured, used, generated, stored or conveyed.10    8. Any enterprise in which sharp edged cutting tools, 11grinders or implements are used, including all enterprises 12which buy, sell or handle junk and salvage, demolish or 13reconstruct machinery.14    9. In any enterprise in which statutory or municipal 15ordinance regulations are now or shall hereafter be imposed 16for the regulating, guarding, use or the placing of machinery 17or appliances or for the protection and safeguarding of the 18employees or the public therein; each of which occupations, 19enterprises or businesses are hereby declared to be extra 20hazardous.21    10. Any enterprise, business or work in connection with 22the laying out or improvement of subdivisions of tracts of 23land.24    11. Any enterprise for the treatment of cross-ties, 25switch-ties, telegraph poles, timber or other wood with 26creosote or other preservatives.  SB0035- 3 -LRB104 02990 SPS 13008 b1    12. Establishments open to the general public wherein 2alcoholic beverages are sold to the general public for 3consumption on the premises.4    13. The operation of any public beauty shop wherein 5chemicals, solutions, or heated instruments or objects are 6used or applied by any employee in the dressing, treatment or 7waving of human hair.8    14. Any business or enterprise serving food to the public 9for consumption on the premises wherein any employee as a 10substantial part of the employee's work uses handcutting 11instruments or slicing machines or other devices for the 12cutting of meat or other food or wherein any employee is in the 13hazard of being scalded or burned by hot grease, hot water, hot 14foods, or other hot fluids, substances or objects.15    15. Any business or enterprise in which electric, gasoline 16or other power driven equipment is used in the operation 17thereof.18    16. Any business or enterprise in which goods, wares or 19merchandise are produced, manufactured or fabricated.20    17. (a) Any business or enterprise in which goods, wares 21or merchandise are sold or in which services are rendered to 22the public at large, provided that this paragraph shall not 23apply to such business or enterprise unless the annual payroll 24during the year next preceding the date of injury shall be in 25excess of $1,000.26    (b) The corporate officers of any domestic or foreign   SB0035- 4 -LRB104 02990 SPS 13008 b1corporation employed by the corporation may elect to withdraw 2themselves as individuals from the operation of this Act. Upon 3an election by the corporate officers to withdraw, written 4notice shall be provided to the insurance carrier of such 5election to withdraw, which election shall be effective upon 6receipt by the insurance carrier of such written notice. A 7corporate officer who thereafter elects to resume coverage 8under the Act as an individual shall provide written notice of 9such election to the insurance carrier which election shall be 10effective upon receipt by the insurance carrier of such 11written notice. For the purpose of this paragraph, a 12"corporate officer" is defined as a bona fide President, Vice 13President, Secretary or Treasurer of a corporation who 14voluntarily elects to withdraw. For the purpose of this 15paragraph, "corporate officer" does not include a sole 16proprietor. 17    18. On and after July 1, 1980, but not before, any 18household or residence wherein domestic workers are employed 19for a total of 40 or more hours per week for a period of 13 or 20more weeks during a calendar year.21    19. Nothing contained in this Act shall be construed to 22apply to any agricultural enterprise, including aquaculture, 23employing less than 400 working days of agricultural or 24aquacultural labor per quarter during the preceding calendar 25year, exclusive of working hours of the employer's spouse and 26other members of his or her immediate family residing with him   SB0035- 5 -LRB104 02990 SPS 13008 b1or her.2    20. (Blank). Nothing contained in this Act shall be 3construed to apply to any sole proprietor or partner or member 4of a limited liability company who elects not to provide and 5pay compensation for accidental injuries sustained by himself, 6arising out of and in the course of the employment according to 7the provisions of this Act.8(Source: P.A. 91-591, eff. 8-14-99.)